epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sr_Cyrl.xml
	<patterns>
		.ђ2
		.ћ2
		.ч2
		.ш2
		.ж2
		.а2б3алиј
		.а2б3анац
		.а2б3ерац
		.а2б3ерир
		.а2б3евак
		.а2б3ирит
		.а2б3ју
		.а2б3ла
		.а2б3лег
		.а2б3леп
		.а2б3лок
		.а2б3лу
		.а2б3ориг
		.а2б3реак
		.а2б3рог
		.а2б3узус
		.а2д3ерац
		.а2д3ј
		.а2д3лат
		.а2д3рен
		.а2д3рог
		.а2д3верб
		.а2н3а4е2ро
		.а2н3афиј
		.а2н3афрод
		.а2н3аго
		.а2н3акуз
		.а2н3алд
		.а2н3алфа
		.а2н3алг
		.а2н3амерт
		.а2н3андр
		.а2н3ант
		.а2н3апто
		.а2н3арх
		.а2н3егер
		.а2н3екл
		.а2н3екум
		.а2н3елек
		.а2н3енер
		.а2н3епи
		.а2н3ерг
		.а2н3ерит
		.а2н3есте
		.а2н3идр
		.а2н3ирид
		.а2н3изог
		.а2н3изом
		.а2н3изур
		.а2н3јон
		.а2н3офт
		.а2н3окс
		.а2н3опис
		.а2н3орг
		.а2н3орх
		.а2н3овар
		.а2набап
		.а2набат
		.а2набаз
		.а2набио
		.а2набол
		.а2надем
		.а2надипл
		.а2надоз
		.а2нафаз
		.а2нафила
		.а2нафон
		.а2нафор
		.а2наген
		.а2нагно
		.а2награ
		.а2нахор
		.а2нахро
		.а2накал
		.а2накам
		.а2накат
		.а2накеф
		.а2накла
		.а2накли
		.а2накој
		.а2накол
		.а2накрон
		.а2накру
		.а2налеп
		.а2налис
		.а2налит
		.а2нализ
		.а2намне
		.а2нанео
		.а2напла
		.а2напле
		.а2напне
		.а2напно
		.а2напро
		.а2напти
		.а2нарт
		.а2насар
		.а2насеи
		.а2наспаз
		.а2наста
		.а2настиг
		.а2настом
		.а2натим
		.а2натоц
		.а2натом
		.а2натре
		.а2натри
		.а2натро
		.а2неор
		.а3г2нос
		.а3г2ноз
		.а4е2ро
		.б2
		.бе2ш3ћ
		.бе2ш3ч
		.бе2с3ц
		.бе2с3к
		.бе2с3п
		.бе2с3т
		.бе2з3алкохол
		.бе2з3атомск
		.бе2з3б
		.бе2з3д
		.бе2з3г
		.бе2з3и
		.бе2з3л
		.бе2з3љ
		.бе2з3м
		.бе2з3н
		.бе2з3њ
		.бе2з3о
		.бе2з3р
		.бе2з3у
		.бе2з3в
		.бе3с4крупул
		.бе3с4покоја
		.бе3с4покојн
		.бе3с4пора
		.бе3с4порн
		.бе3с4тид
		.бе3с4тија
		.бе3с4тиљ
		.бе3с4тилу
		.бе3с4трана
		.бе3с4трас
		.бе3с4твар
		.бе3з4беда
		.бе3з4бедн
		.бе3з4бели
		.бе3з4бједа
		.бе3з4бједн
		.бе3з4бол
		.бе3з4истан
		.бе3з4истен
		.бе3з4јач
		.бе3з4јак
		.бе3з4лоба
		.бе3з4лобн
		.бе3з4начај
		.бе3з4рача
		.бе3з4рачн
		.бе3з4уб
		.бе3з4уп
		.бе3з4вуча
		.бе3з4вучн
		.бе4о
		.бес4тселер
		.би4о
		.ц2
		.д2
		.џ2
		.ди2с3акор
		.ди2с3јунк
		.ди2с3конт
		.ди2с3корд
		.ди2с3кре
		.ди2с3кри
		.ди2с3кур
		.ди2с3квал
		.ди2с3ло
		.ди2с3ориј
		.ди2с3парит
		.ди2с3пон
		.ди2с3поз
		.ди2с3проп
		.ди2с3тон
		.ди2с3трак
		.ф2
		.г2
		.ге4о
		.х2
		.и2ш3ћ
		.и2ш3ч
		.и2ж3ђ
		.и2н3абруп
		.и2н3адек
		.и2н3афек
		.и2н3акце
		.и2н3акур
		.и2н3амор
		.и2н3аниц
		.и2н3аплик
		.и2н3апст
		.и2н3арт
		.и2н3аугур
		.и2н3аура
		.и2н3ед
		.и2н3ефек
		.и2н3ег
		.и2н3екс
		.и2н3екв
		.и2н3елиг
		.и2н3епц
		.и2н3евид
		.и2н3јек
		.и2н3јур
		.и2н3јуст
		.и2н3обл
		.и2н3офиц
		.и2н3окуп
		.и2н3опер
		.и2н3опор
		.и2н3опсе
		.и2н3умбр
		.и2н3унда
		.и2н3унк
		.и2н3утил
		.и2ноген
		.и2нокор
		.и2с3ц
		.и2с3к
		.и2с3п
		.и2с3т
		.и2з3аба
		.и2з3ака
		.и2з3анал
		.и2з3б
		.и2з3бија
		.и2з3бива
		.и2з3д
		.и2з3дај
		.и2з3г
		.и2з3и
		.и2з3л
		.и2з3љ
		.и2з3м
		.и2з3н
		.и2з3њ
		.и2з3о
		.и2з3р
		.и2з3у
		.и2з3в
		.и2з3ведб
		.и2з3веде
		.и2з3веди
		.и2з3ведн
		.и3с4как
		.и3с4кариот
		.и3с4кат
		.и3с4кин
		.и3с4кита
		.и3с4коч
		.и3с4конск
		.и3с4крам
		.и3с4крат
		.и3с4крен
		.и3с4крењ
		.и3с4крич
		.и3с4криш
		.и3с4криц
		.и3с4крит
		.и3с4крој
		.и3с4крса
		.и3с4крсн
		.и3с4купља
		.и3с4квас
		.и3с4кврч
		.и3с4лаб
		.и3с4лам
		.и3с4леђ
		.и3с4лед
		.и3с4лијеђ
		.и3с4лијед
		.и3с4лик
		.и3с4лин
		.и3с4љеђ
		.и3с4љед
		.и3с4лов
		.и3с4луш
		.и3с4луж
		.и3с4ме
		.и3с4мије
		.и3с4мје
		.и3с4паљив
		.и3с4пав
		.и3с4пира
		.и3с4плић
		.и3с4плит
		.и3с4покој
		.и3с4полин
		.и3с4пон
		.и3с4порав
		.и3с4права
		.и3с4прави
		.и3с4правк
		.и3с4прављ
		.и3с4правн
		.и3с4пупч
		.и3с4пур
		.и3с4ред
		.и3с4рк
		.и3с4таћ
		.и3с4такн
		.и3с4там
		.и3с4тар
		.и3с4тас
		.и3с4тави
		.и3с4тављ
		.и3с4тиц
		.и3с4тифан
		.и3с4тин
		.и3с4тир
		.и3с4точа
		.и3с4точн
		.и3с4точњ
		.и3с4ток
		.и3с4тори
		.и3с4трад
		.и3с4тран
		.и3с4трав
		.и3с4трић
		.и3с4триж
		.и3с4триц
		.и3с4труг
		.и3с4туп
		.и3с4уш
		.и3с4ук
		.и3с4ус
		.и3с4ут
		.и3з4бав
		.и3з4бичкава
		.и3з4блеушан
		.и3з4бојак
		.и3з4бојк
		.и3з4драв
		.и3з4гомет
		.и3з4гред
		.и3з4грн
		.и3з4грт
		.и3з4иђ
		.и3з4ид
		.и3з4ими
		.и3з4јежљ
		.и3з4лож
		.и3з4лог
		.и3з4лопаћ
		.и3з4лоз
		.и3з4ним
		.и3з4ној
		.и3з4олац
		.и3з4олат
		.и3з4олир
		.и3з4олов
		.и3з4рачи
		.и3з4раел
		.и3з4раиљ
		.и3з4ун
		.и3з4упч
		.и3з4вала
		.и3з4вале
		.и3з4вали
		.и3з4ваљи
		.и3з4валу
		.и3з4вижд
		.и3з4виискр
		.и3з4вија
		.и3з4вијен
		.и3з4вин
		.и3з4вињ
		.и3з4вир
		.и3з4витоп
		.и3з4вјед
		.и3з4војац
		.и3з4војц
		.и3з4вор
		.инте2р3а
		.инте2р3е
		.инте2р3и
		.инте2р3је
		.инте2р3о
		.инте2р3у
		.инте3р4ежџ
		.инте3р4егн
		.инте3р4еса
		.инте3р4есе
		.инте3р4еси
		.инте3р4есн
		.инте3р4есо
		.инте3р4есу
		.инте3р4ије
		.инте3р4огат
		.ист2к
		.из3бе2з3обр
		.из3бе2з3ум
		.из3г2н
		.из3ва2н3евр
		.из4оанем
		.из4оаном
		.из4обат
		.из4оброн
		.из4одим
		.из4один
		.из4одоз
		.из4офон
		.из4офот
		.из4огам
		.из4огео
		.из4оглос
		.из4огон
		.из4ограф
		.из4охал
		.из4охаз
		.из4охел
		.из4охиј
		.из4охим
		.из4охипс
		.из4охит
		.из4охор
		.из4охро
		.из4оклин
		.из4околон
		.из4олекс
		.из4олукс
		.из4омер
		.из4ометр
		.из4оморф
		.из4онеф
		.из4оном
		.из4опат
		.из4опер
		.из4опле
		.из4опол
		.из4опсеф
		.из4орах
		.из4осеи
		.из4осинт
		.из4осист
		.из4оскел
		.из4оскоп
		.из4остаз
		.из4осте
		.из4отах
		.из4отал
		.из4отер
		.из4отон
		.из4отоп
		.из4отро
		.иза3г2н
		.иза3т2к
		.изд2на
		.изд2но
		.изд2ну
		.изр2к
		.јури2с3к
		.јури2с3п
		.к2
		.љ2
		.м2
		.н2
		.на2д3жањ
		.на2д3ждр
		.на2д3же
		.на2д3жир
		.на2д3жив
		.на2д3жњ
		.на2д3жуп
		.на2д3игр
		.на2д3инж
		.на2д3ина
		.на2д3иск
		.на2д3јач
		.на2д3јах
		.на2д3јеч
		.на2д3јек
		.на2д3јез
		.на2д3јун
		.на2д3л
		.на2д3љ
		.на2д3оч
		.на2д3офи
		.на2д3ора
		.на2д3осе
		.на2д3осје
		.на2д3осо
		.на2д3рач
		.на2д3рашћ
		.на2д3ран
		.на2д3раст
		.на2д3реал
		.на2д3реп
		.на2д3руч
		.на2д3руг
		.на2д3рук
		.на2д3уч
		.на2д3удар
		.на2д3ум
		.на2д3в
		.на2ј3а
		.на2ј3е
		.на2ј3и
		.на2ј3о
		.на2ј3у
		.на3д2нев
		.на3д2нич
		.на3д2ниц
		.на3д4лан
		.на3д4леш
		.на3д4леж
		.на3д4вал
		.на3д4веси
		.на3д4вест
		.на3д4виј
		.на3д4вит
		.на3д4вла
		.на3д4воје
		.на3д4вор
		.на3ј4аш
		.на3ј4ажи
		.на3ј4ада
		.на3ј4аде
		.на3ј4ади
		.на3ј4ах
		.на3ј4ака
		.на3ј4ако
		.на3ј4ало
		.на3ј4ами
		.на3ј4амл
		.на3ј4амн
		.на3ј4арц
		.на3ј4ари
		.на3ј4арм
		.на3ј4ати
		.на3ј4аук
		.на3ј4ава
		.на3ј4аве
		.на3ј4ави
		.на3ј4ављ
		.на3ј4ази
		.на3ј4еже
		.на3ј4ежи
		.на3ј4ежу
		.на3ј4ец
		.на3ј4еда
		.на3ј4еди
		.на3ј4едн
		.на3ј4едр
		.на3ј4ести
		.на3ј4етк
		.на3ј4езд
		.на3ј4езн
		.на3ј4урен
		.на3ј4ури
		.на3т2ках
		.на3т2кам
		.на3т2касм
		.на3т2каст
		.наг2н
		.наг2њ
		.ну2с3пос
		.ну2с3про
		.ну2з3бел
		.ну2з3биљ
		.ну2з3љуб
		.ну2з3ре
		.ну2з3рје
		.ну2з3уж
		.о2б3игр
		.о2б3истин
		.о2б3истињ
		.о2б3ј
		.о2б3лај
		.о2б3лакш
		.о2б3лам
		.о2б3ласк
		.о2б3лећ
		.о2б3леж
		.о2б3леден
		.о2б3лег
		.о2б3леп
		.о2б3лет
		.о2б3лијеж
		.о2б3лијег
		.о2б3лијеп
		.о2б3лијет
		.о2б3лист
		.о2б3лив
		.о2б3лизат
		.о2б3лизав
		.о2б3лизи
		.о2б3љ
		.о2б3лока
		.о2б3луч
		.о2б3лук
		.о2б3ору
		.о2б3р
		.о2б3уж
		.о2б3убож
		.о2б3уд
		.о2б3уме
		.о2б3уми
		.о2б3умр
		.о2б3уз
		.о2д3жал
		.о2д3жаљ
		.о2д3же
		.о2д3жи
		.о2д3жв
		.о2д3арг
		.о2д3и2з3д
		.о2д3и2з3в
		.о2д3игр
		.о2д3иск
		.о2д3исти
		.о2д3ј
		.о2д3л
		.о2д3љ
		.о2д3ок
		.о2д3онд
		.о2д3онл
		.о2д3оно
		.о2д3ону
		.о2д3озд
		.о2д3озг
		.о2д3р
		.о2д3уч
		.о2д3ук
		.о2д3ул
		.о2д3ум
		.о2д3уве
		.о2д3уви
		.о2д3узд
		.о2д3узе
		.о2д3узи
		.о2д3узл
		.о2д3в
		.о3б4јеш
		.о3б4јек
		.о3б4јер
		.о3б4јеси
		.о3б4јет
		.о3б4љан
		.о3б4љут
		.о3б4љуз
		.о3б4рђ
		.о3б4рч
		.о3б4рш
		.о3б4раћ
		.о3б4рашч
		.о3б4рашн
		.о3б4раже
		.о3б4рамб
		.о3б4ран
		.о3б4рањ
		.о3б4рат
		.о3б4раза
		.о3б4разд
		.о3б4рази
		.о3б4разн
		.о3б4разо
		.о3б4разу
		.о3б4ређ
		.о3б4реч
		.о3б4реж
		.о3б4рец
		.о3б4ред
		.о3б4рем
		.о3б4рес
		.о3б4рети
		.о3б4ретн
		.о3б4рич
		.о3б4риц
		.о3б4риј
		.о3б4рис
		.о3б4рит
		.о3б4рив
		.о3б4рк
		.о3б4рл
		.о3б4рљ
		.о3б4рн
		.о3б4роћ
		.о3б4роч
		.о3б4рок
		.о3б4рон
		.о3б4рова
		.о3б4ровц
		.о3б4рс
		.о3б4руч
		.о3б4руш
		.о3б4рук
		.о3б4рун
		.о3б4рус
		.о3д4јећ
		.о3д4јен
		.о3д4јев
		.о3д4лаж
		.о3д4лаг
		.о3д4лака
		.о3д4лаз
		.о3д4луч
		.о3д4лук
		.о3д4рж
		.о3д4раћ
		.о3д4рачи
		.о3д4раж
		.о3д4рана
		.о3д4ране
		.о3д4рани
		.о3д4рано
		.о3д4рану
		.о3д4рапа
		.о3д4рапи
		.о3д4рапљ
		.о3д4раз
		.о3д4ређ
		.о3д4ред
		.о3д4рем
		.о3д4рен
		.о3д4рич
		.о3д4риш
		.о3д4риб
		.о3д4риц
		.о3д4рин
		.о3д4рињ
		.о3д4рл
		.о3д4рљ
		.о3д4рн
		.о3д4рон
		.о3д4роњ
		.о3д4рп
		.о3д4рт
		.о3д4руж
		.о3д4руг
		.о3д4рвеч
		.о3д4рвен
		.о3д4рвењ
		.о3д4важ
		.о3д4вај
		.о3д4веса
		.о3д4весн
		.о3д4вест
		.о3д4вић
		.о3д4викав
		.о3д4викн
		.о3д4вис
		.о3д4вој
		.о3т2ках
		.о3т2кам
		.о3т2касм
		.о3т2каст
		.обе2ш3ћ
		.обе2ш3ч
		.обе2с3ц
		.обе2с3к
		.обе2с3п
		.обе2с3т
		.обе2з3б
		.обе2з3д
		.обе2з3г
		.обе2з3ј
		.обе2з3л
		.обе2з3љ
		.обе2з3м
		.обе2з3н
		.обе2з3о
		.обе2з3р
		.обе2з3у
		.обе2з3в
		.обе3с4тан
		.обе3с4тиј
		.обе3с4тран
		.обе3з4нач
		.обе3з4нан
		.обе3з4нањ
		.обе3з4уб
		.обе3з4виј
		.од3г2н
		.од3м2н
		.ода3д2н
		.ода3г2н
		.по2д3адм
		.по2д3игр
		.по2д3изв
		.по2д3ј
		.по2д3лакат
		.по2д3лакт
		.по2д3лећ
		.по2д3леж
		.по2д3лег
		.по2д3леп
		.по2д3лет
		.по2д3лијећ
		.по2д3лијеж
		.по2д3лијег
		.по2д3лијеп
		.по2д3лијет
		.по2д3лист
		.по2д3лиз
		.по2д3љут
		.по2д3лок
		.по2д3лом
		.по2д3луч
		.по2д3луж
		.по2д3луп
		.по2д3оч
		.по2д3ош
		.по2д3оф
		.по2д3окн
		.по2д3ра2з3д
		.по2д3рад
		.по2д3рам
		.по2д3ран
		.по2д3рањ
		.по2д3рас
		.по2д3равн
		.по2д3равњ
		.по2д3разр
		.по2д3разу
		.по2д3реп
		.по2д3рес
		.по2д3рез
		.по2д3рик
		.по2д3рит
		.по2д3рож
		.по2д3рон
		.по2д3ров
		.по2д3руча
		.по2д3ручи
		.по2д3ручн
		.по2д3руб
		.по2д3рук
		.по2д3упла
		.по2д3усм
		.по2д3усн
		.по2д3вариј
		.по2д3веч
		.по2д3веж
		.по2д3вез
		.по2д3вик
		.по2д3вил
		.по2д3вир
		.по2д3влаш
		.по2д3влас
		.по2д3вођ
		.по2д3вож
		.по2д3вод
		.по2д3воз
		.по2д3врћ
		.по2д3врж
		.по2д3враћ
		.по2д3врат
		.по2д3врг
		.по2д3врис
		.по2д3врс
		.по2д3вућ
		.по2ст3егз
		.по2ст3инду
		.по2ст3лим
		.по2ст3онк
		.по2ст3опер
		.по3д2нев
		.по3д4јеч
		.по3д4јен
		.по3г2н
		.по3м2н
		.по3м2њ
		.по3р2ђ
		.по3т2ках
		.по3т2кам
		.по3т2кат
		.по3т2кав
		.пре2д3же
		.пре2д3жи
		.пре2д3ид
		.пре2д3игр
		.пре2д3испи
		.пре2д3исто
		.пре2д3истр
		.пре2д3изб
		.пре2д3ј
		.пре2д3обј
		.пре2д3одре
		.пре2д3окус
		.пре2д3осе
		.пре2д3осје
		.пре2д3осв
		.пре2д3рач
		.пре2д3рад
		.пре2д3рат
		.пре2д3руч
		.пре2д3убеђ
		.пре2д3убијеђ
		.пре2д3убјеђ
		.пре2д3удар
		.пре2д3угов
		.пре2д3упис
		.пре2д3усло
		.пре2д3увер
		.пре2д3увјер
		.пре2д3увјет
		.пре2д3в
		.пре3д4јен
		.пре3д4вај
		.пре3д4вар
		.пре3д4вест
		.пре3д4воја
		.пре3д4воје
		.пре3д4воји
		.пре3д4вор
		.пре3д4вос
		.пре3т2ках
		.пре3т2кам
		.пре3т2кат
		.пред3м2н
		.пред3м2њ
		.про3г2н
		.про3т2ка
		.про3т2ки
		.проти2в3акц
		.проти2в3оф
		.проти2в3отр
		.проти2в3р
		.проти2в3уд
		.проти2в3ус
		.р2
		.ра2ш3ћ
		.ра2ш3ч
		.ра2ж3ђ
		.ра2с3ц
		.ра2с3к
		.ра2с3п
		.ра2с3т
		.ра2з3анал
		.ра2з3б
		.ра2з3д
		.ра2з3е
		.ра2з3г
		.ра2з3и
		.ра2з3л
		.ра2з3љ
		.ра2з3м
		.ра2з3н
		.ра2з3њ
		.ра2з3оба
		.ра2з3обл
		.ра2з3обр
		.ра2з3од
		.ра2з3орат
		.ра2з3орав
		.ра2з3орт
		.ра2з3ору
		.ра2з3от
		.ра2з3р
		.ра2з3уда
		.ра2з3удб
		.ра2з3уди
		.ра2з3улар
		.ра2з3умр
		.ра2з3уве
		.ра2з3узд
		.ра2з3узе
		.ра2з3узи
		.ра2з3в
		.ра3ш4ћењ
		.ра3ш4чић
		.ра3с4как
		.ра3с4канд
		.ра3с4кин
		.ра3с4клад
		.ра3с4клањ
		.ра3с4клап
		.ра3с4клон
		.ра3с4клопа
		.ра3с4клопи
		.ра3с4клопљ
		.ра3с4кош
		.ра3с4кроп
		.ра3с4пај
		.ра3с4пав
		.ра3с4пета
		.ра3с4пете
		.ра3с4пети
		.ра3с4пето
		.ра3с4пику
		.ра3с4пињ
		.ра3с4плин
		.ра3с4плињ
		.ра3с4пн
		.ра3с4полож
		.ра3с4пон
		.ра3с4пор
		.ра3с4прав
		.ра3с4прем
		.ра3с4рђ
		.ра3с4рд
		.ра3с4ре
		.ра3с4тај
		.ра3с4тан
		.ра3с4тат
		.ра3с4тав
		.ра3с4тењ
		.ра3с4тил
		.ра3с4тињ
		.ра3с4тир
		.ра3с4тис
		.ра3с4тит
		.ра3с4тој
		.ра3с4трел
		.ра3с4трет
		.ра3с4трој
		.ра3с4трт
		.ра3с4тућ
		.ра3с4туп
		.ра3с4тур
		.ра3з4башур
		.ра3з4бад
		.ра3з4бан
		.ра3з4бар
		.ра3з4бау
